Nevada, session 83, SB189.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 629.031 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.031 Except as otherwise provided by a specific statute:
1. “Provider of health care” means:
(a) A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 630A or 633
of NRS;
(b) A physician assistant;
(c) An anesthesiologist assistant;
(d) A genetic counselor;
(e) A dentist;
[(e)] (f) A dental therapist;
[(f)] (g) A dental hygienist;
[(g)] (h) A licensed nurse;
[(h)] (i) A person who holds a license as an attendant or who is
certified as an emergency medical technician, advanced emergency
medical technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS
or authorized to practice as an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic in this State
under the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel
Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145;
[(i)] (j) A dispensing optician;
[(j)] (k) An optometrist;
[(k)] (l) A speech-language pathologist;
[(l)] (m) An audiologist;
[(m)] (n) A practitioner of respiratory care;
[(n)] (o) A licensed physical therapist;
[(o)] (p) An occupational therapist;
[(p)] (q) A podiatric physician;
[(q)] (r) A licensed psychologist;
[(r)] (s) A licensed marriage and family therapist;
[(s)] (t) A licensed clinical professional counselor;
[(t)] (u) A music therapist;
[(u)] (v) A chiropractic physician;
[(v)] (w) An athletic trainer;
[(w)] (x) A perfusionist;
[(x)] (y) A doctor of Oriental medicine in any form;
[(y)] (z) A medical laboratory director or technician;
[(z)] (aa) A pharmacist;
[(aa)] (bb) A licensed dietitian;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
[(bb)] (cc) An associate in social work, a social worker, a
master social worker, an independent social worker or a clinical
social worker licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS;
[(cc)] (dd) An alcohol and drug counselor or a problem
gambling counselor who is certified pursuant to chapter 641C of
NRS;
[(dd)] (ee) An alcohol and drug counselor or a clinical alcohol
and drug counselor who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641C of
NRS;
[(ee)] (ff) A behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst or
registered behavior technician;
[(ff)] (gg) A naprapath; or
[(gg)] (hh) A medical facility as the employer of any person
specified in this subsection.
2. For the purposes of NRS 629.400 to 629.490, inclusive, the
term includes a person who holds a current license or certificate to
practice his or her respective discipline pursuant to the applicable
provisions of law of another state or territory of the United States.
Sec. 2. NRS 629.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.580 1. A person who provides wellness services in
accordance with this section, but who is not licensed, certified or
registered in this State as a provider of health care, is not in
violation of any law based on the unlicensed practice of health care
services or a health care profession unless the person:
(a) Performs surgery or any other procedure which punctures the
skin of any person;
(b) Sets a fracture of any bone of any person;
(c) Prescribes or administers X-ray radiation to any person;
(d) Prescribes or administers a prescription drug or device or a
controlled substance to any person;
(e) Recommends to a client that he or she discontinue or in any
manner alter current medical treatment prescribed by a provider of
health care licensed, certified or registered in this State;
(f) Makes a diagnosis of a medical disease of any person;
(g) Performs a manipulation or a chiropractic adjustment of the
articulations of joints or the spine of any person;
(h) Treats a person’s health condition in a manner that
intentionally or recklessly causes that person recognizable and
imminent risk of serious or permanent physical or mental harm;
(i) Holds out, states, indicates, advertises or implies to any
person that he or she is a provider of health care;
(j) Engages in the practice of medicine or genetic counseling in
violation of chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, the practice of homeopathic
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
medicine in violation of chapter 630A of NRS, the practice of
naprapathy in violation of chapter 634B of NRS or the practice of
podiatry in violation of chapter 635 of NRS, unless otherwise
expressly authorized by this section;
(k) Performs massage therapy as that term is defined in NRS
640C.060, reflexology as that term is defined in NRS 640C.080 or
structural integration as that term is defined in NRS 640C.085;
(l) Provides mental health services that are exclusive to the
scope of practice of a psychiatrist licensed pursuant to chapter 630
or 633 of NRS, or a psychologist licensed pursuant to chapter 641 of
NRS; or
(m) Engages in the practice of applied behavior analysis in
violation of chapter 641D of NRS.
2. Any person providing wellness services in this State who is
not licensed, certified or registered in this State as a provider of
health care and who is advertising or charging a fee for wellness
services shall, before providing those services, disclose to each
client in a plainly worded written statement:
(a) The person’s name, business address and telephone number;
(b) The fact that he or she is not licensed, certified or registered
as a provider of health care in this State;
(c) The nature of the wellness services to be provided;
(d) The degrees, training, experience, credentials and other
qualifications of the person regarding the wellness services to be
provided; and
(e) A statement in substantially the following form:
It is recommended that before beginning any wellness
plan, you notify your primary care physician or other licensed
providers of health care of your intention to use wellness
services, the nature of the wellness services to be provided
and any wellness plan that may be utilized. It is also
recommended that you ask your primary care physician or
other licensed providers of health care about any potential
drug interactions, side effects, risks or conflicts between any
medications or treatments prescribed by your primary care
physician or other licensed providers of health care and the
wellness services you intend to receive.
 A person who provides wellness services shall obtain from each
client a signed copy of the statement required by this subsection,
provide the client with a copy of the signed statement at the time of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
service and retain a copy of the signed statement for a period of not
less than 5 years.
3. A written copy of the statement required by subsection 2
must be posted in a prominent place in the treatment location of the
person providing wellness services in at least 12-point font.
Reasonable accommodations must be made for clients who:
(a) Are unable to read;
(b) Are blind or visually impaired;
(c) Have communication impairments; or
(d) Do not read or speak English or any other language in which
the statement is written.
4. Any advertisement for wellness services authorized pursuant
to this section must disclose that the provider of those services is not
licensed, certified or registered as a provider of health care in this
State.
5. A person who violates any provision of this section is guilty
of a misdemeanor. Before a criminal proceeding is commenced
against a person for a violation of a provision of this section, a
notification, educational or mediative approach must be utilized by
the regulatory body enforcing the provisions of this section to bring
the person into compliance with such provisions.
6. This section does not apply to or control:
(a) Any health care practice by a provider of health care
pursuant to the professional practice laws of this State, or prevent
such a health care practice from being performed.
(b) Any health care practice if the practice is exempt from the
professional practice laws of this State, or prevent such a health care
practice from being performed.
(c) A person who provides health care services if the person is
exempt from the professional practice laws of this State, or prevent
the person from performing such a health care service.
(d) A medical assistant, as that term is defined in NRS 630.0129
and 633.075, an advanced practitioner of homeopathy, as that term
is defined in NRS 630A.015, or a homeopathic assistant, as that
term is defined in NRS 630A.035.
7. As used in this section, “wellness services” means healing
arts therapies and practices, and the provision of products, that are
based on the following complementary health treatment approaches
and which are not otherwise prohibited by subsection 1:
(a) Anthroposophy.
(b) Aromatherapy.
(c) Traditional cultural healing practices.
(d) Detoxification practices and therapies.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(e) Energetic healing.
(f) Folk practices.
(g) Gerson therapy and colostrum therapy.
(h) Healing practices using food, dietary supplements, nutrients
and the physical forces of heat, cold, water and light.
(i) Herbology and herbalism.
(j) Reiki.
(k) Mind-body healing practices.
(l) Nondiagnostic iridology.
(m) Noninvasive instrumentalities.
(n) Holistic kinesiology.
Sec. 3. Chapter 630 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 4 to 12, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 4. 1. “Genetic counseling” means:
(a) Obtaining and evaluating the medical histories of patients
and their families to determine the risk of medical or genetic
conditions in the patient, his or her children and other family
members;
(b) Discussing the features, natural history and means of
diagnosing medical or genetic conditions, genetic and
environmental factors that affect such conditions and ways to
manage the risk related to such conditions;
(c) Identifying, ordering and coordinating genetic laboratory
tests as appropriate to assess the genetics of a patient;
(d) Integrating the results of genetic laboratory tests and other
diagnostic studies with the medical histories of patients and their
families to assess and communicate the existence and severity of
risk factors for medical or genetic conditions;
(e) Explaining the clinical implications and results of a genetic
laboratory test;
(f) Evaluating the responses of a patient or the family of a
patient to learning of a genetic or medical condition or the risk of
such a condition occurring or recurring and providing patient-
centered counseling and anticipatory guidance;
(g) Identifying and utilizing resources in the community that
provide medical, educational, financial and psychosocial support
and advocacy for persons who have or are at risk of having
medical or genetic conditions; and
(h) Providing written documentation of medical and genetic
information, and counseling relating to such information, for
patients, families of patients and providers of health care.
2. The term does not include diagnosis or treatment.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 5. “Genetic counselor” means a person who is licensed
to engage in the practice of genetic counseling by the Board.
Sec. 5.3. “Genetic information” includes, without limitation,
information concerning:
1. A genetic test performed on a person;
2. A genetic test performed on the family members of a
person;
3. A disease or condition that occurs or has occurred in the
family members of a person; or
4. Genetic counseling or genetic education services provided
to a person.
Sec. 5.6. “Genetic test” means a test, including a laboratory
test that uses deoxyribonucleic acid extracted from the cells of a
person or a diagnostic test, to determine the presence of
abnormalities or deficiencies, including carrier status, that:
1. Are linked to physical or mental disorders or impairments;
or
2. Indicate a susceptibility to illness, disease, impairment or
any other disorder, whether physical or mental.
Sec. 5.9. 1. The Genetic Counseling Advisory Council is
hereby created.
2. The Board shall appoint to the Advisory Council:
(a) One physician licensed in this State who has experience in
the field of genetics;
(b) Three members who hold a valid certification issued by the
American Board of Genetic Counseling, or its successor
organization, and are actively engaged in the practice of genetic
counseling; and
(c) One member who is a representative of the public.
3. Each member of the Advisory Council must be a resident
of this State.
4. After the initial terms, the members of the Advisory
Council must be appointed to terms of 2 years. Members may be
reappointed.
5. A vacancy on the Advisory Council must be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
6. The Board may remove a member of the Advisory Council
for incompetence, neglect of duty, moral turpitude or malfeasance
in office.
7. The members of the Advisory Council are not entitled to
compensation.
8. The Advisory Council shall:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(a) Elect from its members a Chair and any other officers
determined necessary by the members of the Advisory Council at
the first meeting of each year;
(b) Meet at least two times each year at the call of the Chair of
the Advisory Council; and
(c) Advise the Board on the adoption of regulations
concerning the practice of genetic counseling and other matters
related to the practice of genetic counseling.
9. A majority of the members of the Advisory Council
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of the business of the
Advisory Council.
Sec. 6. The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
licensure and practice of genetic counselors, including, without
limitation, regulations:
1. Adopting by reference the Code of Ethics published by the
National Society of Genetic Counselors, or its successor
organization, as a code of ethics governing the professional
conduct of genetic counselors;
2. Defining “temporary basis” for the purposes of subsection
3 of section 9 of this act; and
3. Establishing the requirements for the renewal of a license,
in addition to those set forth in section 10 of this act.
Sec. 7. To be eligible for licensing by the Board as a genetic
counselor, an applicant must:
1. Be a natural person of good moral character;
2. Submit a completed application as required by the Board
by the date established by the Board;
3. Submit the fee prescribed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 630.268;
4. Have received a master’s degree or higher in genetic
counseling from a program in genetic counseling that is:
(a) Accredited by the Accreditation Council for Genetic
Counseling, or its successor organization; or
(b) Located in a foreign country and has educational
standards that are at least as stringent as those established by the
Accreditation Council for Genetic Counseling, or its successor
organization, as determined by the Board;
5. Pass the examination administered by the American Board
of Genetic Counseling, or its successor organization, or the
examination in clinical genetics and genomics administered by the
American Board of Medical Genetics and Genomics, or its
successor organization; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
6. Hold a valid certification issued by the American Board of
Genetic Counseling, or its successor organization.
Sec. 8. 1. The Board may issue a temporary license to
practice as a genetic counselor to a person who:
(a) Has satisfied all requirements for licensure except the
requirements of subsections 5 and 6 of section 7 of this act; and
(b) Submits the fee prescribed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 630.268.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, a
temporary license to practice as a genetic counselor issued
pursuant to this section expires on the earlier of:
(a) The issuance to the temporarily licensed genetic counselor
of a license as a genetic counselor pursuant to section 7 of this
act;
(b) If the temporarily licensed genetic counselor passes an
examination described in subsection 5 of section 7 of this act, 30
days after the results of the examination are issued by the
administering organization; or
(c) One year after the date on which the temporarily licensed
genetic counselor temporary license is issued pursuant to this
section.
3. The Board may renew a temporary license issued pursuant
to this section once for good cause, as determined by the Board, if
the temporarily licensed genetic counselor:
(a) Maintains active status as a candidate with the American
Board of Genetic Counseling, or its successor organization; and
(b) Submits the fee prescribed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 630.268.
4. If the Board renews a temporary license pursuant to
subsection 3, the Board shall prescribe the length of time for
which the temporary license remains valid.
5. A temporarily licensed genetic counselor may practice
genetic counseling only under the supervision of a genetic
counselor or a physician. The supervisor shall assess the work of
the temporarily licensed genetic counselor, but is not required to
be present while the temporarily licensed genetic counselor is
practicing genetic counseling.
6. Before commencing a supervisory relationship pursuant to
subsection 5 and annually thereafter for the duration of the
supervisory relationship, a supervisor and a temporarily licensed
genetic counselor must enter into a contract that prescribes the
responsibilities of the supervisor and the temporarily licensed
genetic counselor.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
7. The Board may adopt regulations establishing additional
requirements for the supervision of a temporarily licensed genetic
counselor pursuant to subsection 5.
Sec. 9. 1. A student who is enrolled in a program in genetic
counseling described in subsection 4 of section 7 of this act and
who does not hold a license to practice genetic counseling may
assist a genetic counselor in the practice of genetic counseling if
such assistance is within the scope of the education and training
of the student.
2. Any other person who is not licensed to practice genetic
counseling may assist a physician, osteopathic physician,
physician assistant licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter
633 of NRS, advanced practice registered nurse or genetic
counselor in the practice of genetic counseling under the direct
supervision of a physician, osteopathic physician, physician
assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or genetic counselor
who is on the same premises where the assistance is being
provided.
3. A person who is not licensed to practice genetic counseling
in this State, the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States but holds a valid certification issued by the
American Board of Genetic Counseling, or its successor
organization, may provide consulting services related to genetic
counseling in this State on a temporary basis if he or she receives
authorization from the Board.
4. A physician or physician assistant who engages in genetic
counseling as part of his or her practice of medicine or practice as
a physician assistant, as applicable, is not required to obtain a
license as a genetic counselor.
Sec. 10. 1. Each license issued pursuant to section 7 of this
act expires on June 30 or, if June 30 is a Saturday, Sunday or
legal holiday, on the next business day after June 30, of every odd-
numbered year and may be renewed if, before the license expires,
the holder of the license submits to the Board:
(a) A completed application for renewal on a form prescribed
by the Board;
(b) Proof that the applicant has successfully completed at least
20 hours of continuing education approved by the National
Society of Genetic Counselors, or its successor organization, since
the license was issued or most recently renewed, as applicable;
(c) Proof that the applicant holds a valid certification issued by
the American Board of Genetic Counseling, or its successor
organization;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(d) Proof that the applicant has satisfied any other
requirements prescribed by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to section 6 of this act; and
(e) The applicable fee for renewal of the license prescribed by
the Board pursuant to NRS 630.268.
2. The Board shall send a notice of renewal to each licensee
not later than 60 days before his or her license expires. The notice
must include the amount of the fee for renewal of the license.
Sec. 11. 1. If a genetic counselor desires to surrender his or
her license, the genetic counselor shall submit to the Board a
sworn written statement of surrender of the license and the actual
license issued to him or her. The Board may accept or reject the
surrender of the license and may negotiate stipulations for
accepting the surrender of the license.
2. If the Board accepts the surrender of a license pursuant to
subsection 1, the Board may restore the license at a later date
under such conditions as the Board deems appropriate.
Sec. 12. 1. The following acts constitute grounds for
initiating disciplinary action against a genetic counselor or
denying licensure as a genetic counselor:
(a) Obtaining, maintaining or renewing or attempting to
obtain, maintain or renew a license to practice genetic counseling
by bribery, fraud or misrepresentation or by any false, misleading,
inaccurate or incomplete statement.
(b) Disobeying any order of the Board or an investigative
committee of the Board.
(c) Conviction of:
(1) A crime relating to the practice of genetic counseling;
(2) A violation of any of the provisions of NRS 616D.200,
616D.220, 616D.240 or 616D.300 to 616D.440, inclusive; or
(3) Any offense involving moral turpitude.
(d) Being adjudicated incompetent or incapacitated.
(e) Advertising the practice of genetic counseling in a false,
deceptive or misleading manner.
(f) Advertising, practicing or attempting to practice genetic
counseling under a name other than one’s own.
(g) Practicing or assisting in the practice of genetic counseling
while under the influence of alcohol, any controlled substance or
any other substance which impairs the mental capacity of the
genetic counselor.
(h) Violating the Code of Ethics adopted by reference pursuant
to section 6 of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(i) Lack of ability to safely and skillfully practice genetic
counseling due to a lack of knowledge or training or the inability
to apply professional principles and skills.
(j) Violating or attempting to violate, or assisting or abetting
the violation of, or conspiring to violate any provision of this
chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
(k) Any disciplinary action, including, without limitation, the
revocation, suspension, modification or limitation of a license to
practice genetic counseling, taken by another state, the Federal
Government, a foreign country or any other jurisdiction or the
surrender of the license or discontinuing the practice of genetic
counseling while under investigation by any licensing authority, a
medical facility, a branch of the Armed Forces of the United
States, an insurance company, an agency of the Federal
Government or an employer.
(l) Failure to be found competent to practice genetic
counseling as a result of an examination to determine competency
pursuant to NRS 630.318.
(m) Performing or supervising the performance of a pelvic
examination in violation of NRS 629.085.
(n) Operation of a medical facility at any time during which:
(1) The license of the facility is suspended or revoked; or
(2) An act or omission occurs which results in the
suspension or revocation of the license pursuant to NRS 449.160.
 This paragraph applies to an owner or other principal
responsible for the operation of the facility.
(o) Any other grounds specified by regulation of the Board.
2. A genetic counselor shall notify the Board not later than
48 hours after the certification of the genetic counselor by the
American Board of Genetic Counseling, or its successor
organization, lapses or is revoked. Upon receipt of such
notification, the Board shall immediately revoke the license of the
genetic counselor.
Sec. 13. NRS 630.003 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.003 1. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(a) It is among the responsibilities of State Government to
ensure, as far as possible, that only competent persons practice
medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion and respiratory care within
this State;
(b) For the protection and benefit of the public, the Legislature
delegates to the Board of Medical Examiners the power and duty to
determine the initial and continuing competence of physicians,
genetic counselors, perfusionists, physician assistants,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
anesthesiologist assistants and practitioners of respiratory care who
are subject to the provisions of this chapter;
(c) The Board must exercise its regulatory power to ensure that
the interests of the medical profession do not outweigh the interests
of the public;
(d) The Board must ensure that unfit physicians, genetic
counselors, perfusionists, physician assistants, anesthesiologist
assistants and practitioners of respiratory care are removed from [the
medical profession] those professions so that they will not cause
harm to the public; and
(e) The Board must encourage and allow for public input into its
regulatory activities to further improve the quality of medical
practice within this State.
2. The powers conferred upon the Board by this chapter must
be liberally construed to carry out these purposes for the protection
and benefit of the public.
Sec. 14. NRS 630.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.005 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 630.007 to 630.026,
inclusive, and sections 4 to 5.6, inclusive, of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 15. NRS 630.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.045 1. The purpose of licensing physicians, genetic
counselors, perfusionists, physician assistants, anesthesiologist
assistants and practitioners of respiratory care is to protect the public
health and safety and the general welfare of the people of this State.
2. Any license issued pursuant to this chapter is a revocable
privilege.
Sec. 16. NRS 630.047 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.047 1. This chapter does not apply to:
(a) A medical officer [or] , genetic counselor, perfusionist or
practitioner of respiratory care of the Armed Forces or a medical
officer [or] , genetic counselor, perfusionist or practitioner of
respiratory care of any division or department of the United States in
the discharge of his or her official duties, including, without
limitation, providing medical care in a hospital in accordance with
an agreement entered into pursuant to NRS 449.2455;
(b) Physicians who are called into this State, other than on a
regular basis, for consultation with or assistance to a physician
licensed in this State, and who are legally qualified to practice in the
state where they reside;
(c) Physicians who are legally qualified to practice in the state
where they reside and come into this State on an irregular basis to:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
(1) Obtain medical training approved by the Board from a
physician who is licensed in this State; or
(2) Provide medical instruction or training approved by the
Board to physicians licensed in this State;
(d) Physicians who are temporarily exempt from licensure
pursuant to NRS 630.2665 and are practicing medicine within the
scope of the exemption;
(e) Any person permitted to practice any other healing art under
this title who does so within the scope of that authority, or healing
by faith or Christian Science;
(f) The practice of respiratory care by a student as part of a
program of study in respiratory care that is approved by the Board,
or is recognized by a national organization which is approved by the
Board to review such programs, if the student is enrolled in the
program and provides respiratory care only under the supervision of
a practitioner of respiratory care;
(g) The practice of respiratory care by a student who:
(1) Is enrolled in a clinical program of study in respiratory
care which has been approved by the Board;
(2) Is employed by a medical facility, as defined in NRS
449.0151; and
(3) Provides respiratory care to patients who are not in a
critical medical condition or, in an emergency, to patients who are in
a critical medical condition and a practitioner of respiratory care is
not immediately available to provide that care and the student is
directed by a physician to provide respiratory care under the
supervision of the physician until a practitioner of respiratory care is
available;
(h) The practice of respiratory care by a person on himself or
herself or gratuitous respiratory care provided to a friend or a
member of a person’s family if the provider of the care does not
represent himself or herself as a practitioner of respiratory care;
(i) A person who is employed by a physician and provides
respiratory care or services as a perfusionist under the supervision of
that physician;
(j) The maintenance of medical equipment for perfusion or
respiratory care that is not attached to a patient;
(k) A person who installs medical equipment for respiratory care
that is used in the home and gives instructions regarding the use of
that equipment if the person is trained to provide such services and
is supervised by a provider of health care who is acting within the
authorized scope of his or her practice;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
(l) The performance of medical services by a student enrolled in
an educational program for a physician assistant which is accredited
by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the
Physician Assistant, Inc., or its successor organization, as part of
such a program; [and]
(m) A physician assistant of any division or department of the
United States in the discharge of his or her official duties unless
licensure by a state is required by the division or department of the
United States [.] ; and
(n) Any person permitted to practice any other healing art
under this title who engages in the practice of genetic counseling
within the scope of that authority, if he or she does not represent
himself or herself to be licensed pursuant to this chapter.
2. This chapter does not repeal or affect any statute of Nevada
regulating or affecting any other healing art.
3. This chapter does not prohibit:
(a) Gratuitous services outside of a medical school or medical
facility by a person who is not a physician, genetic counselor,
perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or
practitioner of respiratory care in cases of emergency.
(b) The domestic administration of family remedies.
Sec. 17. NRS 630.049 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.049 For the purposes of this chapter, any act that
constitutes the practice of medicine or genetic counseling shall be
deemed to occur at the place where the patient is located at the time
the act is performed.
Sec. 18. NRS 630.075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.075 1. The Board may, by majority vote, select
physicians, anesthesiologist assistants , genetic counselors and
members of the public, who must meet the same qualifications as
required for members of the Board, to serve as advisory members of
the Board.
2. One or more advisory members may be designated by the
Board to assist a committee of its members in an investigation as
provided in NRS 630.311 but may not vote on any matter before the
committee. Advisory members may also serve as members of the
panel selected to hear charges as provided in NRS 630.339 and may
vote on any recommendation made by the panel to the Board.
Sec. 19. NRS 630.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.120 1. The Board shall procure a seal.
2. All licenses issued to physicians, genetic counselors,
perfusionists, physician assistants, anesthesiologist assistants and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
practitioners of respiratory care must bear the seal of the Board and
the signatures of its President and Secretary-Treasurer.
Sec. 20. NRS 630.137 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.137 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law and
except as otherwise provided in this section, the Board shall not
adopt any regulations that prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting a
physician, genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care from
collaborating or consulting with another provider of health care.
2. The provisions of this section do not prevent the Board from
adopting regulations that prohibit a physician, genetic counselor,
perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or
practitioner of respiratory care from aiding or abetting another
person in the unlicensed practice of medicine or the unlicensed
practice of genetic counseling, perfusion or respiratory care.
3. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 21. NRS 630.167 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.167 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth in
this chapter, each applicant for a license to practice medicine,
including, without limitation, an expedited license pursuant to NRS
630.1606 or 630.1607 or chapter 629A of NRS, and each applicant
for a license to practice as a genetic counselor, to practice as a
perfusionist, to practice as a physician assistant, to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant or to practice respiratory care shall submit
to the Board a complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report. Any fees or
costs charged by the Board for this service pursuant to NRS 630.268
are not refundable.
2. Any communication between the Board and the Interstate
Medical Licensure Compact Commission created by NRS 629A.100
relating to verification of a physician’s eligibility for expedited
licensure pursuant to that section must not include any information
received in a report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
relating to a state and federal criminal records check performed for
the purposes of an application for an expedited license issued
pursuant to NRS 629A.100.
Sec. 22. NRS 630.197 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.197 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth in
this chapter:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
(a) An applicant for the issuance of a license to practice
medicine, to practice as a genetic counselor, to practice as a
perfusionist, to practice as a physician assistant, to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant or to practice as a practitioner of
respiratory care shall include the social security number of the
applicant in the application submitted to the Board.
(b) An applicant for the issuance or renewal of a license to
practice medicine, to practice as a genetic counselor, to practice as
a perfusionist, to practice as a physician assistant, to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant or to practice as a practitioner of
respiratory care shall submit to the Board the statement prescribed
by the Division of Welfare and Supportive Services of the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
425.520. The statement must be completed and signed by the
applicant.
2. The Board shall include the statement required pursuant to
subsection 1 in:
(a) The application or any other forms that must be submitted
for the issuance or renewal of the license; or
(b) A separate form prescribed by the Board.
3. A license to practice medicine, to practice as a genetic
counselor, to practice as a perfusionist, to practice as a physician
assistant, to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant or to practice as
a practitioner of respiratory care may not be issued or renewed by
the Board if the applicant:
(a) Fails to submit the statement required pursuant to subsection
1; or
(b) Indicates on the statement submitted pursuant to subsection
1 that the applicant is subject to a court order for the support of a
child and is not in compliance with the order or a plan approved by
the district attorney or other public agency enforcing the order for
the repayment of the amount owed pursuant to the order.
4. If an applicant indicates on the statement submitted pursuant
to subsection 1 that the applicant is subject to a court order for the
support of a child and is not in compliance with the order or a plan
approved by the district attorney or other public agency enforcing
the order for the repayment of the amount owed pursuant to the
order, the Board shall advise the applicant to contact the district
attorney or other public agency enforcing the order to determine the
actions that the applicant may take to satisfy the arrearage.
Sec. 23. NRS 630.268 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.268 1. The Board shall charge and collect not more than
the following fees:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
For application for and issuance of a license to
practice as a physician, including a license by
endorsement ................................................................ $600
For application for and issuance of a temporary,
locum tenens, limited, restricted, authorized
facility, special, special purpose or special
event license .................................................................. 400
For renewal of a limited, restricted, authorized
facility or special license ............................................... 400
For application for and issuance of a license as a
physician assistant, including a license by
endorsement .................................................................. 400
For application for and issuance of a
simultaneous license as a physician assistant ................ 200
For biennial registration of a physician assistant................ 800
For biennial simultaneous registration of a
physician assistant ......................................................... 400
For biennial registration of a physician .............................. 800
For application for and issuance of a license as a
perfusionist or practitioner of respiratory care .............. 400
For biennial renewal of a license as a
perfusionist .................................................................... 600
For application for and issuance of a license or
temporary license to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant ............................................... 400
For application for and initial issuance of a
simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist
assistant ......................................................................... 200
For biennial registration of an anesthesiologist
assistant ......................................................................... 800
For biennial simultaneous registration of an
anesthesiologist assistant ............................................... 400
For biennial registration of a practitioner of
respiratory care .............................................................. 600
For biennial registration for a physician who is
on inactive status ................................................................ 400
For application for and issuance of a license or
temporary license to practice as a genetic
counselor....................................................................... 400
For biennial renewal of a license to practice as
a genetic counselor or renewal of a
temporary license to practice as a genetic
counselor....................................................................... 600
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
For written verification of licensure ..................................... 50
For a duplicate identification card ........................................ 25
For a duplicate license .......................................................... 50
For computer printouts or labels ......................................... 500
For verification of a listing of physicians, per
hour ................................................................................. 20
For furnishing a list of new physicians ............................... 100
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, in
addition to the fees prescribed in subsection 1, the Board shall
charge and collect necessary and reasonable fees for the expedited
processing of a request or for any other incidental service the Board
provides.
3. The cost of any special meeting called at the request of a
licensee, an institution, an organization, a state agency or an
applicant for licensure must be paid for by the person or entity
requesting the special meeting. Such a special meeting must not be
called until the person or entity requesting it has paid a cash deposit
with the Board sufficient to defray all expenses of the meeting.
4. If an applicant submits an application for a license by
endorsement pursuant to:
(a) NRS 630.1607, and the applicant is an active member of, or
the spouse of an active member of, the Armed Forces of the United
States, a veteran or the surviving spouse of a veteran, the Board
shall collect not more than one-half of the fee set forth in subsection
1 for the initial issuance of the license. As used in this paragraph,
“veteran” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 417.005.
(b) NRS 630.2752, the Board shall collect not more than one-
half of the fee set forth in subsection 1 for the initial issuance of the
license.
5. If an applicant submits an application for a license by
endorsement pursuant to NRS 630.1606 or 630.2751, as applicable,
the Board shall charge and collect not more than the fee specified in
subsection 1 for the application for and initial issuance of a license.
Sec. 24. NRS 630.3067 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.3067 1. The insurer of a physician, physician assistant,
genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist
licensed under this chapter shall report to the Board:
(a) Any action for malpractice against the physician, physician
assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist not later than 45 days after the physician, physician
assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
perfusionist receives service of a summons and complaint for the
action;
(b) Any claim for malpractice against the physician, physician
assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist that is submitted to arbitration or mediation not later
than 45 days after the claim is submitted to arbitration or mediation;
and
(c) Any settlement, award, judgment or other disposition of any
action or claim described in paragraph (a) or (b) not later than 45
days after the settlement, award, judgment or other disposition.
2. The Board shall report any failure to comply with subsection
1 by an insurer licensed in this State to the Division of Insurance of
the Department of Business and Industry. If, after a hearing, the
Division of Insurance determines that any such insurer failed to
comply with the requirements of subsection 1, the Division may
impose an administrative fine of not more than $10,000 against the
insurer for each such failure to report. If the administrative fine is
not paid when due, the fine must be recovered in a civil action
brought by the Attorney General on behalf of the Division.
Sec. 25. NRS 630.3068 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.3068 1. A physician, physician assistant, genetic
counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist shall
report to the Board:
(a) Any action for malpractice against the physician, physician
assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist not later than 45 days after the physician, physician
assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist receives service of a summons and complaint for the
action;
(b) Any claim for malpractice against the physician, physician
assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist that is submitted to arbitration or mediation not later
than 45 days after the claim is submitted to arbitration or mediation;
(c) Any settlement, award, judgment or other disposition of any
action or claim described in paragraph (a) or (b) not later than 45
days after the settlement, award, judgment or other disposition,
including, without limitation, any amount paid to resolve the claim;
and
(d) Any sanctions imposed against the physician, physician
assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist that are reportable to the National Practitioner Data
Bank not later than 45 days after the sanctions are imposed.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
2. If the Board finds that a physician, physician assistant,
genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist
has violated any provision of this section, the Board may impose a
fine of not more than $5,000 against the physician, physician
assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist for each violation, in addition to any other fines or
penalties permitted by law.
3. All reports made by a physician, physician assistant, genetic
counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist pursuant to
this section are public records.
Sec. 26. NRS 630.3069 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.3069 If the Board receives a report pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 630.3067, 630.3068 or 690B.250 indicating that
a judgment has been rendered or an award has been made against a
physician, physician assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of
respiratory care or perfusionist regarding an action or claim for
malpractice or that such an action or claim against the physician,
physician assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory
care or perfusionist has been resolved by settlement, the Board shall
conduct an investigation to determine whether to impose
disciplinary action against the physician, physician assistant, genetic
counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist regarding
the action or claim, unless the Board has already commenced or
completed such an investigation regarding the action or claim before
it receives the report.
Sec. 27. NRS 630.307 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.307 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, any
person may file with the Board a complaint against a physician,
genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant or practitioner of respiratory care on a form provided by
the Board. The form may be submitted in writing or electronically.
If a complaint is submitted anonymously, the Board may accept the
complaint but may refuse to consider the complaint if the lack of the
identity of the complainant makes processing the complaint
impossible or unfair to the person who is the subject of the
complaint.
2. Any licensee, medical school or medical facility that
becomes aware that a person practicing medicine, genetic
counseling, perfusion or respiratory care in this State has, is or is
about to become engaged in conduct which constitutes grounds for
initiating disciplinary action shall file a written complaint with the
Board within 30 days after becoming aware of the conduct.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, any hospital,
clinic or other medical facility licensed in this State, or medical
society, shall report to the Board any change in the privileges of a
physician, genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care to
practice while the physician, genetic counselor, perfusionist,
physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of
respiratory care is under investigation and the outcome of any
disciplinary action taken by that facility or society against the
physician, genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care
concerning the care of a patient or the competency of the physician,
genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant or practitioner of respiratory care within 30 days after the
change in privileges is made or disciplinary action is taken.
4. A hospital, clinic or other medical facility licensed in this
State, or medical society, shall report to the Board within 5 days
after a change in the privileges of a physician, genetic counselor,
perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or
practitioner of respiratory care to practice that is based on:
(a) An investigation of the mental, medical or psychological
competency of the physician, genetic counselor, perfusionist,
physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of
respiratory care; or
(b) Suspected or alleged substance abuse in any form by the
physician, genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care.
5. The Board shall report any failure to comply with subsection
3 or 4 by a hospital, clinic or other medical facility licensed in this
State to the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services. If, after a hearing, the
Division of Public and Behavioral Health determines that any such
facility or society failed to comply with the requirements of
subsection 3 or 4, the Division may impose an administrative fine of
not more than $10,000 against the facility or society for each such
failure to report. If the administrative fine is not paid when due, the
fine must be recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney
General on behalf of the Division.
6. The clerk of every court shall report to the Board any
finding, judgment or other determination of the court that a
physician, genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care:
(a) Is mentally ill;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
(b) Is mentally incompetent;
(c) Has been convicted of a felony or any law governing
controlled substances or dangerous drugs;
(d) Is guilty of abuse or fraud under any state or federal program
providing medical assistance; or
(e) Is liable for damages for malpractice or negligence,
 within 45 days after such a finding, judgment or determination is
made.
7. The Board shall retain all complaints filed with the Board
pursuant to this section for at least 10 years, including, without
limitation, any complaints not acted upon.
Sec. 28. NRS 630.309 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.309 To institute a disciplinary action against a genetic
counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant or practitioner of respiratory care, a written complaint,
specifying the charges, must be filed with the Board by:
1. The Board or a committee designated by the Board to
investigate a complaint;
2. Any member of the Board; or
3. Any other person who is aware of any act or circumstance
constituting a ground for disciplinary action set forth in the
regulations adopted by the Board.
Sec. 29. NRS 630.318 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.318 1. If the Board or any investigative committee of the
Board has reason to believe that the conduct of any physician,
physician assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory
care or perfusionist has raised a reasonable question as to his or her
competence to practice medicine, genetic counseling, respiratory
care or perfusion or practice as a physician assistant, as applicable,
with reasonable skill and safety to patients, or if the Board has
received a report pursuant to the provisions of NRS 630.3067,
630.3068 or 690B.250 indicating that a judgment has been rendered
or an award has been made against a physician, physician assistant,
genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist
regarding an action or claim for malpractice or that such an action or
claim against the physician, physician assistant, genetic counselor,
practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist has been resolved by
settlement, the Board or committee may order that the physician,
physician assistant, genetic counselor, practitioner of respiratory
care or perfusionist undergo a mental or physical examination, an
examination testing his or her competence to practice medicine,
genetic counseling, respiratory care or perfusion or practice as a
physician assistant, as applicable, or any other examination
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
designated by the Board to assist the Board or committee in
determining the fitness of the physician, physician assistant, genetic
counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist to practice
medicine, genetic counseling, respiratory care or perfusion or
practice as a physician assistant, as applicable.
2. For the purposes of this section:
(a) Every physician, physician assistant, genetic counselor,
practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist who applies for a
license or who is licensed under this chapter shall be deemed to
have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination or
an examination testing his or her competence to practice medicine,
genetic counseling, respiratory care or perfusion or practice as a
physician assistant, as applicable, when ordered to do so in writing
by the Board or an investigative committee of the Board.
(b) The testimony or reports of a person who conducts an
examination of a physician, physician assistant, genetic counselor,
practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist on behalf of the Board
or an investigative committee of the Board pursuant to this section
are not privileged communications.
3. Except in extraordinary circumstances, as determined by the
Board, the failure of a physician, physician assistant, genetic
counselor, practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist licensed
under this chapter to submit to an examination when directed as
provided in this section constitutes an admission of the charges
against the physician, physician assistant, genetic counselor,
practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist.
Sec. 30. NRS 630.326 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.326 1. If an investigation by the Board regarding a
physician, genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care
reasonably determines that the health, safety or welfare of the public
or any patient served by the licensee is at risk of imminent or
continued harm, the Board may summarily suspend the license of
the licensee pending the conclusion of a hearing to consider a formal
complaint against the licensee. The order of summary suspension
may be issued only by the Board or an investigative committee of
the Board.
2. If the Board or an investigative committee of the Board
issues an order summarily suspending the license of a physician,
genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant or practitioner of respiratory care pursuant to subsection 1,
the Board shall hold a hearing not later than 60 days after the date
on which the order is issued, unless the Board and the licensee
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
mutually agree to a longer period, to determine whether a reasonable
basis exists to continue the suspension of the license pending the
conclusion of a hearing to consider a formal complaint against the
licensee. If no formal complaint against the licensee is pending
before the Board on the date on which a hearing is held pursuant to
this section, the Board shall reinstate the license of the licensee.
3. If the Board or an investigative committee of the Board
issues an order summarily suspending the license of a licensee
pursuant to subsection 1 and the Board requires the licensee to
submit to a mental or physical examination or an examination
testing his or her competence to practice, the examination must be
conducted and the results obtained not later than 30 days after the
order is issued.
Sec. 31. NRS 630.329 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.329 If the Board issues an order suspending the license of
a physician, genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care pending
proceedings for disciplinary action, including, without limitation, a
summary suspension pursuant to NRS 233B.127, the court shall not
stay that order.
Sec. 32. NRS 630.336 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.336 1. Any deliberations conducted or vote taken by the
Board or any investigative committee of the Board regarding its
ordering of a physician, genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care
to undergo a physical or mental examination or any other
examination designated to assist the Board or committee in
determining the fitness of a physician, genetic counselor,
perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or
practitioner of respiratory care are not subject to the requirements of
NRS 241.020.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or 4, all
applications for a license to practice medicine, genetic counseling,
perfusion or respiratory care, any charges filed by the Board,
financial records of the Board, formal hearings on any charges heard
by the Board or a panel selected by the Board, records of such
hearings and any order or decision of the Board or panel must be
open to the public.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, the
following may be kept confidential:
(a) Any statement, evidence, credential or other proof submitted
in support of or to verify the contents of an application;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
(b) Any report concerning the fitness of any person to receive or
hold a license to practice medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion or
respiratory care; and
(c) Any communication between:
(1) The Board and any of its committees or panels; and
(2) The Board or its staff, investigators, experts, committees,
panels, hearing officers, advisory members or consultants and
counsel for the Board.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
239.0115, a complaint filed with the Board pursuant to NRS
630.307, all documents and other information filed with the
complaint and all documents and other information compiled as a
result of an investigation conducted to determine whether to initiate
disciplinary action are confidential.
5. The formal complaint or other document filed by the Board
to initiate disciplinary action and all documents and information
considered by the Board when determining whether to impose
discipline are public records.
6. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or agency or any agency which is
investigating a person, including a law enforcement agency. Such
cooperation may include, without limitation, providing the board or
agency with minutes of a closed meeting, transcripts of oral
examinations and the results of oral examinations.
Sec. 33. NRS 630.346 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.346 In any disciplinary hearing:
1. The Board, a panel of the members of the Board and a
hearing officer are not bound by formal rules of evidence, except
that evidence must be taken and considered in the hearing pursuant
to NRS 233B.123, and a witness must not be barred from testifying
solely because the witness was or is incompetent.
2. A finding of the Board must be supported by a
preponderance of the evidence.
3. Proof of actual injury need not be established.
4. A certified copy of the record of a court or a licensing
agency showing a conviction or plea of nolo contendere or the
suspension, revocation, limitation, modification, denial or surrender
of a license to practice medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion or
respiratory care is conclusive evidence of its occurrence.
Sec. 34. NRS 630.358 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.358 1. Any person:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
(a) Whose practice of medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion
or respiratory care has been limited; or
(b) Whose license to practice medicine, genetic counseling,
perfusion or respiratory care has been:
(1) Suspended until further order; or
(2) Revoked,
 by an order of the Board, may apply to the Board for removal of
the limitation or restoration of the license.
2. In hearing the application, the Board:
(a) May require the person to submit to a mental or physical
examination or an examination testing his or her competence to
practice medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion or respiratory care
by physicians, genetic counselors, perfusionists or practitioners of
respiratory care, as appropriate, or other examinations it designates
and submit such other evidence of changed conditions and of fitness
as it deems proper;
(b) Shall determine whether under all the circumstances the time
of the application is reasonable; and
(c) May deny the application or modify or rescind its order as it
deems the evidence and the public safety warrants.
3. The licensee has the burden of proving by clear and
convincing evidence that the requirements for restoration of the
license or removal of the limitation have been met.
4. The Board shall not restore a license unless it is satisfied that
the person has complied with all of the terms and conditions set
forth in the final order of the Board and that the person is capable of
practicing medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion or respiratory
care in a safe manner.
5. To restore a license that has been revoked by the Board, the
applicant must apply for a license and take an examination as
though the applicant had never been licensed under this chapter.
Sec. 35. NRS 630.366 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.366 1. If the Board receives a copy of a court order
issued pursuant to NRS 425.540 that provides for the suspension of
all professional, occupational and recreational licenses, certificates
and permits issued to a person who is the holder of a license to
practice medicine, to practice as a genetic counselor, to practice as
a perfusionist, to practice as a physician assistant, to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant or to practice as a practitioner of
respiratory care, the Board shall deem the license issued to that
person to be suspended at the end of the 30th day after the date on
which the court order was issued unless the Board receives a letter
issued to the holder of the license by the district attorney or other
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
public agency pursuant to NRS 425.550 stating that the holder of the
license has complied with the subpoena or warrant or has satisfied
the arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560.
2. The Board shall reinstate a license to practice medicine, to
practice as a genetic counselor, to practice as a perfusionist, to
practice as a physician assistant, to practice as an anesthesiologist
assistant or to practice as a practitioner of respiratory care that has
been suspended by a district court pursuant to NRS 425.540 if the
Board receives a letter issued by the district attorney or other public
agency pursuant to NRS 425.550 to the person whose license was
suspended stating that the person whose license was suspended has
complied with the subpoena or warrant or has satisfied the arrearage
pursuant to NRS 425.560.
Sec. 36. NRS 630.388 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.388 1. In addition to any other remedy provided by law,
the Board, through its President or Secretary-Treasurer or the
Attorney General, may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction:
(a) To enjoin any prohibited act or other conduct of a licensee
which is harmful to the public;
(b) To enjoin any person who is not licensed under this chapter
from practicing medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion or
respiratory care;
(c) To limit the practice of a physician, genetic counselor,
perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or
practitioner of respiratory care, or suspend his or her license to
practice;
(d) To enjoin the use of the title “P.A.,” “P.A.-C,” “C.A.A.,”
“R.C.P.” or any other word, combination of letters or other
designation intended to imply or designate a person as a physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory
care, when not licensed by the Board pursuant to this chapter, unless
the use is otherwise authorized by a specific statute; [or]
(e) To enjoin the use of the title “L.P.,” “T.L.P.,” “licensed
perfusionist,” “temporarily licensed perfusionist” or any other word,
combination of letters or other designation intended to imply or
designate a person as a perfusionist, when not licensed by the Board
pursuant to this chapter, unless the use is otherwise authorized by a
specific statute [.] ; or
(f) To enjoin the use of the title “G.A.,” “G.C.,” “L.G.C.,”
“R.G.C.,” “genetic associate,” “genetic counselor,” “licensed
genetic counselor,” “registered genetic counselor” or any other
word, combination of letters or other designation intended to imply
or designate a person as a genetic counselor, when not licensed by
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
the Board pursuant to this chapter, unless the use is otherwise
authorized by a specific statute.
2. The court in a proper case may issue a temporary restraining
order or a preliminary injunction for the purposes set forth in
subsection 1:
(a) Without proof of actual damage sustained by any person;
(b) Without relieving any person from criminal prosecution for
engaging in the practice of medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion
or respiratory care without a license; and
(c) Pending proceedings for disciplinary action by the Board.
Sec. 37. NRS 630.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.390 In seeking injunctive relief against any person for an
alleged violation of this chapter by practicing medicine, genetic
counseling, perfusion or respiratory care without a license, it is
sufficient to allege that the person did, upon a certain day, and in a
certain county of this State, engage in the practice of medicine,
genetic counseling, perfusion or respiratory care without having a
license to do so, without alleging any further or more particular facts
concerning the same.
Sec. 38. NRS 630.395 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.395 Any member or agent of the Board may enter any
premises in this State where a person who holds a license issued
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter practices medicine, genetic
counseling, perfusion or respiratory care and inspect it to determine
whether a violation of any provision of this chapter has occurred,
including, without limitation:
1. An inspection to determine whether any person at the
premises is practicing medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion or
respiratory care without the appropriate license issued pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter; or
2. An inspection to determine whether any physician is
allowing a person to perform or participate in any activity under the
supervision of the physician for the purpose of receiving credit
toward a degree of doctor of medicine, osteopathy or osteopathic
medicine in violation of the provisions of NRS 630.3745.
Sec. 39. NRS 630.397 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.397 Unless the Board determines that extenuating
circumstances exist, the Board shall forward to the appropriate law
enforcement agency any substantiated information submitted to the
Board concerning a person who practices or offers to practice
medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion or respiratory care without
the appropriate license issued pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
Sec. 40. NRS 630.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.400 1. It is unlawful for any person to:
(a) Present to the Board as his or her own the diploma, license or
credentials of another;
(b) Give either false or forged evidence of any kind to the
Board;
(c) Practice medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion or
respiratory care under a false or assumed name or falsely personate
another licensee;
(d) Except as otherwise provided by a specific statute, practice
medicine, genetic counseling, perfusion or respiratory care without
being licensed under this chapter;
(e) Hold himself or herself out as a perfusionist or use any other
term indicating or implying that he or she is a perfusionist without
being licensed by the Board;
(f) Hold himself or herself out as a physician assistant or use any
other term indicating or implying that he or she is a physician
assistant without being licensed by the Board;
(g) Hold himself or herself out as an anesthesiologist assistant or
use any other term indicating or implying that he or she is an
anesthesiologist assistant without being licensed by the Board; [or]
(h) Hold himself or herself out as a practitioner of respiratory
care or use any other term indicating or implying that he or she is a
practitioner of respiratory care without being licensed by the Board
[.] ; or
(i) Hold himself or herself out as a genetic counselor or use
any other term indicating or implying that he or she is a genetic
counselor without being licensed by the Board.
2. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to NRS
200.830 or 200.840, a person who violates any provision of
subsection 1:
(a) If no substantial bodily harm results, is guilty of a category
D felony; or
(b) If substantial bodily harm results, is guilty of a category C
felony,
 and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
3. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, if the
Board determines that a person has committed any act described in
subsection 1, the Board may:
(a) Issue and serve on the person an order to cease and desist
until the person obtains from the Board the proper license or
otherwise demonstrates that he or she is no longer in violation of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
subsection 1. An order to cease and desist must include a telephone
number with which the person may contact the Board.
(b) Issue a citation to the person. A citation issued pursuant to
this paragraph must be in writing, describe with particularity the
nature of the violation and inform the person of the provisions of
this paragraph. Each activity in which the person is engaged
constitutes a separate offense for which a separate citation may be
issued. To appeal a citation, the person must submit a written
request for a hearing to the Board not later than 30 days after the
date of issuance of the citation.
(c) Assess against the person an administrative fine of not more
than $5,000.
(d) Impose any combination of the penalties set forth in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
Sec. 41. NRS 630A.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.090 1. This chapter does not apply to:
(a) The practice of genetic counseling, dentistry, chiropractic,
naprapathy, Oriental medicine, podiatry, optometry, perfusion,
respiratory care, faith or Christian Science healing, nursing,
veterinary medicine or fitting hearing aids.
(b) A medical officer of the Armed Forces or a medical officer
of any division or department of the United States in the discharge
of his or her official duties, including, without limitation, providing
medical care in a hospital in accordance with an agreement entered
into pursuant to NRS 449.2455.
(c) Licensed or certified nurses in the discharge of their duties as
nurses.
(d) Homeopathic physicians who are called into this State, other
than on a regular basis, for consultation or assistance to any
physician licensed in this State, and who are legally qualified to
practice in the state or country where they reside.
2. This chapter does not repeal or affect any statute of Nevada
regulating or affecting any other healing art.
3. This chapter does not prohibit:
(a) Gratuitous services of a person in case of emergency.
(b) The domestic administration of family remedies.
4. This chapter does not authorize a homeopathic physician to
practice medicine, including allopathic medicine, except as
otherwise provided in NRS 630A.040.
Sec. 42. NRS 632.472 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.472 1. The following persons shall report in writing to
the Executive Director of the Board any conduct of a licensee or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
holder of a certificate which constitutes a violation of the provisions
of this chapter:
(a) Any physician, dentist, dental hygienist, expanded function
dental assistant, naprapath, chiropractic physician, optometrist,
podiatric physician, medical examiner, resident, intern, professional
or practical nurse, nursing assistant, medication aide - certified,
genetic counselor, perfusionist, physician assistant licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, anesthesiologist assistant,
psychiatrist, psychologist, marriage and family therapist, clinical
professional counselor, alcohol or drug counselor, peer recovery
support specialist, peer recovery support specialist supervisor, music
therapist, holder of a license or limited license issued pursuant to
chapter 653 of NRS, driver of an ambulance, paramedic or other
person providing medical services licensed or certified to practice in
this State.
(b) Any personnel of a medical facility or facility for the
dependent engaged in the admission, examination, care or treatment
of persons or an administrator, manager or other person in charge of
a medical facility or facility for the dependent upon notification by a
member of the staff of the facility.
(c) A coroner.
(d) Any person who maintains or is employed by an agency to
provide personal care services in the home.
(e) Any person who operates, who is employed by or who
contracts to provide services for an intermediary service
organization as defined in NRS 449.4304.
(f) Any person who maintains or is employed by an agency to
provide nursing in the home.
(g) Any employee of the Department of Health and Human
Services.
(h) Any employee of a law enforcement agency or a county’s
office for protective services or an adult or juvenile probation
officer.
(i) Any person who maintains or is employed by a facility or
establishment that provides care for older persons.
(j) Any person who maintains, is employed by or serves as a
volunteer for an agency or service which advises persons regarding
the abuse, neglect or exploitation of an older person and refers them
to persons and agencies where their requests and needs can be met.
(k) Any social worker.
(l) Any person who operates or is employed by a community
health worker pool or with whom a community health worker pool
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
contracts to provide the services of a community health worker, as
defined in NRS 449.0027.
2. Every physician who, as a member of the staff of a medical
facility or facility for the dependent, has reason to believe that a
nursing assistant or medication aide - certified has engaged in
conduct which constitutes grounds for the denial, suspension or
revocation of a certificate shall notify the superintendent, manager
or other person in charge of the facility. The superintendent,
manager or other person in charge shall make a report as required in
subsection 1.
3. A report may be filed by any other person.
4. Any person who in good faith reports any violation of the
provisions of this chapter to the Executive Director of the Board
pursuant to this section is immune from civil liability for reporting
the violation.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Agency to provide personal care services in the home” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.0021.
(b) “Community health worker pool” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 449.0028.
(c) “Peer recovery support specialist” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 433.627.
(d) “Peer recovery support specialist supervisor” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 433.629.
Sec. 43. NRS 633.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.171 1. This chapter does not apply to:
(a) The practice of medicine , genetic counseling or perfusion
pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS, dentistry, chiropractic, naprapathy,
podiatry, optometry, respiratory care, faith or Christian Science
healing, nursing, veterinary medicine or fitting hearing aids.
(b) A medical officer of the Armed Forces or a medical officer
of any division or department of the United States in the discharge
of his or her official duties, including, without limitation, providing
medical care in a hospital in accordance with an agreement entered
into pursuant to NRS 449.2455.
(c) Osteopathic physicians who are called into this State, other
than on a regular basis, for consultation or assistance to a physician
licensed in this State, and who are legally qualified to practice in the
state where they reside.
(d) Osteopathic physicians who are temporarily exempt from
licensure pursuant to NRS 633.420 and are practicing osteopathic
medicine within the scope of the exemption.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
(e) The performance of medical services by a student enrolled in
an educational program for a physician assistant which is accredited
by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the
Physician Assistant, Inc., or its successor organization, as part of
such a program.
(f) A physician assistant of any division or department of the
United States in the discharge of his or her official duties unless
licensure by a state is required by the division or department of the
United States.
(g) Any person permitted to practice any other healing art under
this title who does so within the scope of that authority.
2. This chapter does not repeal or affect any law of this State
regulating or affecting any other healing art.
3. This chapter does not prohibit:
(a) Gratuitous services of a person in cases of emergency.
(b) The domestic administration of family remedies.
Sec. 44. NRS 640E.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640E.090 1. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any person who is licensed or registered in this State as a
physician pursuant to chapter 630, 630A or 633 of NRS, genetic
counselor, dentist, nurse, dispensing optician, optometrist,
occupational therapist, practitioner of respiratory care, physical
therapist, podiatric physician, psychologist, marriage and
family therapist, chiropractic physician, naprapath, athletic trainer,
massage therapist, reflexologist, structural integration practitioner,
perfusionist, doctor of Oriental medicine in any form, medical
laboratory director or technician or pharmacist who:
(1) Practices within the scope of that license or registration;
(2) Does not represent that he or she is a licensed dietitian or
registered dietitian; and
(3) Provides nutrition information incidental to the practice
for which he or she is licensed or registered.
(b) A student enrolled in an educational program accredited by
the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition and Dietetics,
or its successor organization, if the student engages in the practice
of dietetics under the supervision of a licensed dietitian or registered
dietitian as part of that educational program.
(c) A registered dietitian employed by the Armed Forces of the
United States, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or
any division or department of the Federal Government in the
discharge of his or her official duties, including, without limitation,
the practice of dietetics or providing nutrition services.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
(d) A person who furnishes nutrition information, provides
recommendations or advice concerning nutrition, or markets food,
food materials or dietary supplements and provides nutrition
information, recommendations or advice related to that marketing, if
the person does not represent that he or she is a licensed dietitian or
registered dietitian. While performing acts described in this
paragraph, a person shall be deemed not to be engaged in the
practice of dietetics or the providing of nutrition services.
(e) A person who provides services relating to weight loss or
weight control through a program reviewed by and in consultation
with a licensed dietitian or physician or a dietitian licensed or
registered in another state which has equivalent licensure
requirements as this State, as long as the person does not change the
services or program without the approval of the person with whom
he or she is consulting.
2. As used in this section, “nutrition information” means
information relating to the principles of nutrition and the effect of
nutrition on the human body, including, without limitation:
(a) Food preparation;
(b) Food included in a normal daily diet;
(c) Essential nutrients required by the human body and
recommended amounts of essential nutrients, based on nationally
established standards;
(d) The effect of nutrients on the human body and the effect of
deficiencies in or excess amounts of nutrients in the human body;
and
(e) Specific foods or supplements that are sources of essential
nutrients.
Sec. 45. NRS 7.095 is hereby amended to read as follows:
7.095 1. An attorney shall not contract for or collect a fee
contingent on the amount of recovery for representing a person
seeking damages in connection with an action for injury or death
against a provider of health care based upon professional negligence
in excess of 35 percent of the amount recovered.
2. The limitations set forth in subsection 1 apply to all forms of
recovery, including, without limitation, settlement, arbitration and
judgment.
3. For the purposes of this section, “recovered” means the net
sum recovered by the plaintiff after deducting any disbursements or
costs incurred in connection with the prosecution or settlement of
the claim. Costs of medical care incurred by the plaintiff and general
and administrative expenses incurred by the office of the attorney
are not deductible disbursements or costs.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Professional negligence” means a negligent act or omission
to act by a provider of health care in the rendering of professional
services, which act or omission is the proximate cause of a personal
injury or wrongful death. The term does not include services that are
outside the scope of services for which the provider of health care is
licensed or services for which any restriction has been imposed by
the applicable regulatory board or health care facility.
(b) “Provider of health care” means a physician licensed under
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, genetic counselor, dentist, registered
nurse, dispensing optician, optometrist, registered physical therapist,
podiatric physician, licensed psychologist, chiropractic physician,
naprapath, doctor of Oriental medicine, holder of a license or a
limited license issued under the provisions of chapter 653 of NRS,
medical laboratory director or technician, licensed dietitian or a
licensed hospital and its employees.
Sec. 46. NRS 41A.017 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41A.017 “Provider of health care” means a physician licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, physician assistant, genetic
counselor, anesthesiologist assistant, dentist, licensed nurse,
dispensing optician, optometrist, registered physical therapist,
podiatric physician, licensed psychologist, chiropractic physician,
naprapath, doctor of Oriental medicine, holder of a license or a
limited license issued under the provisions of chapter 653 of NRS,
medical laboratory director or technician, licensed dietitian or a
licensed hospital, clinic, surgery center, physicians’ professional
corporation or group practice that employs any such person and its
employees.
Sec. 47. NRS 42.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
42.021 1. In an action for injury or death against a provider
of health care based upon professional negligence, if the defendant
so elects, the defendant may introduce evidence of any amount
payable as a benefit to the plaintiff as a result of the injury or death
pursuant to the United States Social Security Act, any state or
federal income disability or worker’s compensation act, any health,
sickness or income-disability insurance, accident insurance that
provides health benefits or income-disability coverage, and any
contract or agreement of any group, organization, partnership or
corporation to provide, pay for or reimburse the cost of medical,
hospital, dental or other health care services. If the defendant elects
to introduce such evidence, the plaintiff may introduce evidence of
any amount that the plaintiff has paid or contributed to secure the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
plaintiff’s right to any insurance benefits concerning which the
defendant has introduced evidence.
2. A source of collateral benefits introduced pursuant to
subsection 1 may not:
(a) Recover any amount against the plaintiff; or
(b) Be subrogated to the rights of the plaintiff against a
defendant.
3. In an action for injury or death against a provider of health
care based upon professional negligence, a district court shall, at the
request of either party, enter a judgment ordering that money
damages or its equivalent for future damages of the judgment
creditor be paid in whole or in part by periodic payments rather than
by a lump-sum payment if the award equals or exceeds $50,000 in
future damages.
4. In entering a judgment ordering the payment of future
damages by periodic payments pursuant to subsection 3, the court
shall make a specific finding as to the dollar amount of periodic
payments that will compensate the judgment creditor for such future
damages. As a condition to authorizing periodic payments of future
damages, the court shall require a judgment debtor who is not
adequately insured to post security adequate to assure full payment
of such damages awarded by the judgment. Upon termination of
periodic payments of future damages, the court shall order the return
of this security, or so much as remains, to the judgment debtor.
5. A judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments entered pursuant to subsection 3 must specify the
recipient or recipients of the payments, the dollar amount of the
payments, the interval between payments, and the number of
payments or the period of time over which payments will be made.
Such payments must only be subject to modification in the event of
the death of the judgment creditor. Money damages awarded for loss
of future earnings must not be reduced or payments terminated by
reason of the death of the judgment creditor, but must be paid to
persons to whom the judgment creditor owed a duty of support, as
provided by law, immediately before the judgment creditor’s death.
In such cases, the court that rendered the original judgment may,
upon petition of any party in interest, modify the judgment to award
and apportion the unpaid future damages in accordance with this
subsection.
6. If the court finds that the judgment debtor has exhibited a
continuing pattern of failing to make the periodic payments as
specified pursuant to subsection 5, the court shall find the judgment
debtor in contempt of court and, in addition to the required periodic
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
payments, shall order the judgment debtor to pay the judgment
creditor all damages caused by the failure to make such periodic
payments, including, but not limited to, court costs and attorney’s
fees.
7. Following the occurrence or expiration of all obligations
specified in the periodic payment judgment, any obligation of the
judgment debtor to make further payments ceases and any security
given pursuant to subsection 4 reverts to the judgment debtor.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Future damages” includes damages for future medical
treatment, care or custody, loss of future earnings, loss of bodily
function, or future pain and suffering of the judgment creditor.
(b) “Periodic payments” means the payment of money or
delivery of other property to the judgment creditor at regular
intervals.
(c) “Professional negligence” means a negligent act or omission
to act by a provider of health care in the rendering of professional
services, which act or omission is the proximate cause of a personal
injury or wrongful death. The term does not include services that are
outside the scope of services for which the provider of health care is
licensed or services for which any restriction has been imposed by
the applicable regulatory board or health care facility.
(d) “Provider of health care” means a physician licensed under
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, genetic counselor, dentist, licensed
nurse, dispensing optician, optometrist, registered physical therapist,
podiatric physician, naprapath, licensed psychologist, chiropractic
physician, doctor of Oriental medicine, holder of a license or a
limited license issued under the provisions of chapter 653 of NRS,
medical laboratory director or technician, licensed dietitian or a
licensed hospital and its employees.
Sec. 48. NRS 49.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
49.215 As used in NRS 49.215 to 49.245, inclusive:
1. A communication is “confidential” if it is not intended to be
disclosed to third persons other than:
(a) Those present to further the interest of the patient in the
consultation, examination or interview;
(b) Persons reasonably necessary for the transmission of the
communication; or
(c) Persons who are participating in the diagnosis and treatment
under the direction of the doctor, including members of the patient’s
family.
2. “Doctor” means a person licensed to practice medicine,
genetic counseling, dentistry or osteopathic medicine, chiropractic
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
or naprapathy in any state or nation, or a person who is reasonably
believed by the patient to be so licensed, and in addition includes a
person employed by a public or private agency as a psychiatric
social worker, or someone under his or her guidance, direction or
control, while engaged in the examination, diagnosis or treatment of
a patient for a mental condition.
3. “Patient” means a person who consults or is examined or
interviewed by a doctor for purposes of diagnosis or treatment.
Sec. 49. NRS 52.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
52.320 As used in NRS 52.320 to 52.375, inclusive, unless the
context otherwise requires:
1. “Custodian of medical records” means a chiropractic
physician, naprapath, physician, genetic counselor, registered
physical therapist or licensed nurse who prepares and maintains
medical records, or any employee or agent of such a person or a
facility for convalescent care, medical laboratory or hospital who
has care, custody and control of medical records for such a person or
institution.
2. “Medical records” includes bills, ledgers, statements and
other accounts which show the cost of medical services or care
provided to a patient.
Sec. 50. NRS 89.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
89.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
professional entity may be organized only for the purpose of
rendering one specific type of professional service and may not
engage in any business other than rendering the professional service
for which it was organized and services reasonably related thereto,
except that a professional entity may own real and personal property
appropriate to its business and may invest its money in any form of
real property, securities or any other type of investment.
2. A professional entity may be organized to render a
professional service relating to:
(a) Architecture, interior design, residential design, engineering
and landscape architecture, or any combination thereof, and may be
composed of persons:
(1) Engaged in the practice of architecture as provided in
chapter 623 of NRS;
(2) Practicing as a registered interior designer as provided in
chapter 623 of NRS;
(3) Engaged in the practice of residential design as provided
in chapter 623 of NRS;
(4) Engaged in the practice of landscape architecture as
provided in chapter 623A of NRS; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
(5) Engaged in the practice of professional engineering as
provided in chapter 625 of NRS.
(b) Medicine, genetic counseling, homeopathy, osteopathy,
naprapathy, chiropractic and psychology, or any combination
thereof, and may be composed of persons engaged in the practice of:
(1) Medicine or genetic counseling as provided in chapter
630 of NRS;
(2) Homeopathic medicine as provided in chapter 630A of
NRS;
(3) Osteopathic medicine as provided in chapter 633 of NRS;
(4) Chiropractic as provided in chapter 634 of NRS;
(5) Naprapathy as provided in chapter 634B of NRS; and
(6) Psychology and licensed to provide services pursuant to
chapter 641 of NRS.
 Such a professional entity may market and manage additional
professional entities which are organized to render a professional
service relating to medicine, genetic counseling, homeopathy,
osteopathy, naprapathy, chiropractic and psychology.
(c) Mental health services, and may be composed of the
following persons, in any number and in any combination:
(1) Any psychologist who is licensed to practice in this State;
(2) Any social worker who holds a master’s degree in social
work and who is licensed by this State as a clinical social worker;
(3) Any registered nurse who is licensed to practice
professional nursing in this State and who holds a master’s degree in
the field of psychiatric nursing;
(4) Any marriage and family therapist who is licensed by this
State pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS; and
(5) Any clinical professional counselor who is licensed by
this State pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS.
 Such a professional entity may market and manage additional
professional entities which are organized to render a professional
service relating to mental health services pursuant to this paragraph.
3. A professional entity may render a professional service only
through its officers, managers and employees who are licensed or
otherwise authorized by law to render the professional service.
Sec. 51. NRS 200.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.471 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means:
(1) Unlawfully attempting to use physical force against
another person; or
(2) Intentionally placing another person in reasonable
apprehension of immediate bodily harm.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
(b) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(c) “Health care facility” means a facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS, an office of a person listed in NRS 629.031, a
clinic or any other location, other than a residence, where health
care is provided.
(d) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard or other correctional officer of a city or
county jail;
(5) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including a
person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed in this subparagraph;
(7) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(8) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
(9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-fighting
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
(10) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or a
political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
(e) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A physician, a medical student, a genetic counselor, a
perfusionist, an anesthesiologist assistant or a physician assistant
licensed pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS, a practitioner of
respiratory care, a homeopathic physician, an advanced practitioner
of homeopathy, a homeopathic assistant, an osteopathic physician, a
physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 633 of NRS, a podiatric physician, a podiatry hygienist, a
physical therapist, a medical laboratory technician, an optometrist, a
chiropractic physician, a chiropractic assistant, a naprapath, a doctor
of Oriental medicine, a nurse, a student nurse, a certified nursing
assistant, a nursing assistant trainee, a medication aide - certified, a
person who provides health care services in the home for
compensation, a dentist, a dental student, a dental hygienist, a dental
hygienist student, an expanded function dental assistant, an
expanded function dental assistant student, a pharmacist, a
pharmacy student, an intern pharmacist, an attendant on an
ambulance or air ambulance, a psychologist, a social worker, a
marriage and family therapist, a marriage and family therapist
intern, a clinical professional counselor, a clinical professional
counselor intern, a behavior analyst, an assistant behavior analyst, a
registered behavior technician, a mental health technician, a licensed
dietitian, the holder of a license or a limited license issued under the
provisions of chapter 653 of NRS, a public safety officer at a health
care facility, an emergency medical technician, an advanced
emergency medical technician, a paramedic or a participant in a
program of training to provide emergency medical services; or
(2) An employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
who:
(I) Interacts with the public;
(II) Performs tasks related to providing health care; and
(III) Wears identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the person as an employee or volunteer of the health care
facility.
(f) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
(g) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
(h) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(i) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706.8816.
(j) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a taxicab.
(k) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus or
other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
(l) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility as
defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the employee
to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. A person convicted of an assault shall be punished:
(a) If paragraph (c) or (d) does not apply to the circumstances of
the crime and the assault is not made with the use of a deadly
weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a
misdemeanor.
(b) If the assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the
present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
(c) If paragraph (d) does not apply to the circumstances of the
crime and if the assault:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a provider of health care, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a utility worker or a sports
official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, unless the assault is made with the use
of a deadly weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon,
then for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the assault:
(1) Is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who is in
lawful custody or confinement or a parolee upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The probationer, prisoner or parolee charged knew or
should have known that the victim was an officer, a provider of
health care, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a
utility worker or a sports official,
 for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130, unless the
assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the present
ability to use a deadly weapon, then for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 52. NRS 200.5093 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.5093 1. Any person who is described in subsection 4 and
who, in a professional or occupational capacity, knows or has
reasonable cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable
person has been abused, neglected, exploited, isolated or abandoned
shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, report the
abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment of the older
person or vulnerable person to:
(1) The local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) A police department or sheriff’s office; or
(3) A toll-free telephone service designated by the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services; and
(b) Make such a report as soon as reasonably practicable but not
later than 24 hours after the person knows or has reasonable cause to
believe that the older person or vulnerable person has been abused,
neglected, exploited, isolated or abandoned.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
2. If a person who is required to make a report pursuant to
subsection 1 knows or has reasonable cause to believe that the
abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment of the older
person or vulnerable person involves an act or omission of the
Aging and Disability Services Division, another division of the
Department of Health and Human Services or a law enforcement
agency, the person shall make the report to an agency other than the
one alleged to have committed the act or omission.
3. Each agency, after reducing a report to writing, shall forward
a copy of the report to the Aging and Disability Services Division of
the Department of Health and Human Services and the Unit for the
Investigation and Prosecution of Crimes.
4. A report must be made pursuant to subsection 1 by the
following persons:
(a) Every physician, dentist, dental hygienist, expanded function
dental assistant, chiropractic physician, naprapath, optometrist,
podiatric physician, medical examiner, resident, intern, professional
or practical nurse, physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
630 or 633 of NRS, genetic counselor, anesthesiologist assistant,
perfusionist, psychiatrist, psychologist, marriage and family
therapist, clinical professional counselor, clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, alcohol and drug counselor, music therapist, athletic
trainer, driver of an ambulance, paramedic, licensed dietitian, holder
of a license or a limited license issued under the provisions of
chapter 653 of NRS, behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst,
registered behavior technician, peer recovery support specialist, as
defined in NRS 433.627, peer recovery support specialist
supervisor, as defined in NRS 433.629, or other person providing
medical services licensed or certified to practice in this State, who
examines, attends or treats an older person or vulnerable person who
appears to have been abused, neglected, exploited, isolated or
abandoned.
(b) Any personnel of a hospital or similar institution engaged in
the admission, examination, care or treatment of persons or an
administrator, manager or other person in charge of a hospital or
similar institution upon notification of the suspected abuse, neglect,
exploitation, isolation or abandonment of an older person or
vulnerable person by a member of the staff of the hospital.
(c) A coroner.
(d) Every person who maintains or is employed by an agency to
provide personal care services in the home.
(e) Every person who maintains or is employed by an agency to
provide nursing in the home.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 47 –
(f) Every person who operates, who is employed by or who
contracts to provide services for an intermediary service
organization as defined in NRS 449.4304.
(g) Any employee of the Department of Health and Human
Services, except the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman appointed
pursuant to NRS 427A.125 and any of his or her advocates or
volunteers where prohibited from making such a report pursuant to
45 C.F.R. § 1321.11.
(h) Any employee of a law enforcement agency or a county’s
office for protective services or an adult or juvenile probation
officer.
(i) Any person who maintains or is employed by a facility or
establishment that provides care for older persons or vulnerable
persons.
(j) Any person who maintains, is employed by or serves as a
volunteer for an agency or service which advises persons regarding
the abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment of an
older person or vulnerable person and refers them to persons and
agencies where their requests and needs can be met.
(k) Every social worker.
(l) Any person who owns or is employed by a funeral home or
mortuary.
(m) Every person who operates or is employed by a community
health worker pool, as defined in NRS 449.0028, or with whom a
community health worker pool contracts to provide the services of a
community health worker, as defined in NRS 449.0027.
(n) Every person who is enrolled with the Division of Health
Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and Human
Services to provide doula services to recipients of Medicaid
pursuant to NRS 422.27177.
5. A report may be made by any other person.
6. If a person who is required to make a report pursuant to
subsection 1 knows or has reasonable cause to believe that an older
person or vulnerable person has died as a result of abuse, neglect,
isolation or abandonment, the person shall, as soon as reasonably
practicable, report this belief to the appropriate medical examiner or
coroner, who shall investigate the cause of death of the older person
or vulnerable person and submit to the appropriate local law
enforcement agencies, the appropriate prosecuting attorney, the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health
and Human Services and the Unit for the Investigation and
Prosecution of Crimes his or her written findings. The written
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 48 –
findings must include the information required pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 200.5094, when possible.
7. A division, office or department which receives a report
pursuant to this section shall cause the investigation of the report to
commence within 3 working days. A copy of the final report of the
investigation conducted by a division, office or department, other
than the Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department
of Health and Human Services, must be forwarded within 30 days
after the completion of the report to the:
(a) Aging and Disability Services Division;
(b) Repository for Information Concerning Crimes Against
Older Persons or Vulnerable Persons created by NRS 179A.450;
and
(c) Unit for the Investigation and Prosecution of Crimes.
8. If the investigation of a report results in the belief that an
older person or vulnerable person is abused, neglected, exploited,
isolated or abandoned, the Aging and Disability Services Division
of the Department of Health and Human Services or the county’s
office for protective services may provide protective services to the
older person or vulnerable person if the older person or vulnerable
person is able and willing to accept them.
9. A person who knowingly and willfully violates any of the
provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
10. As used in this section, “Unit for the Investigation and
Prosecution of Crimes” means the Unit for the Investigation
and Prosecution of Crimes Against Older Persons or Vulnerable
Persons in the Office of the Attorney General created pursuant to
NRS 228.265.
Sec. 53. NRS 202.2491 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.2491 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5
and 6 and NRS 202.24915, the smoking of tobacco in any form is
prohibited if done in any:
(a) Public elevator.
(b) Public building.
(c) Public waiting room, lobby or hallway of any:
(1) Medical facility or facility for the dependent as defined in
chapter 449 of NRS; or
(2) Office of any chiropractic physician, naprapath, dentist,
physical therapist, physician, genetic counselor, podiatric physician,
psychologist, optician, optometrist or doctor of Oriental medicine.
(d) Hotel or motel when so designated by the operator thereof.
(e) Public area of a store principally devoted to the sale of food
for human consumption off the premises.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 49 –
(f) Child care facility.
(g) Bus used by the general public, other than a chartered bus, or
in any maintenance facility or office associated with a bus system
operated by any regional transportation commission.
(h) School bus.
(i) Video arcade.
2. The person in control of an area listed in paragraph (c), (d),
(e) or (g) of subsection 1:
(a) Shall post in the area signs prohibiting smoking in any place
not designated for that purpose as provided in paragraph (b).
(b) May designate separate rooms or portions of the area which
may be used for smoking, except for a room or portion of the area of
a store described in paragraph (e) of subsection 1 if the room or
portion of the area:
(1) Is leased to or operated by a person licensed pursuant to
NRS 463.160; and
(2) Does not otherwise qualify for an exemption set forth in
NRS 202.24915.
3. The person in control of a public building:
(a) Shall post in the area signs prohibiting smoking in any place
not designated for that purpose as provided in paragraph (b).
(b) Shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
designate a separate area which may be used for smoking.
 A school district which prohibits the use of tobacco by pupils
need not designate an area which may be used by the pupils to
smoke.
4. The operator of a restaurant with a seating capacity of 50 or
more shall maintain a flexible nonsmoking area within the restaurant
and offer each patron the opportunity to be seated in a smoking or
nonsmoking area.
5. A business which derives more than 50 percent of its gross
receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages or 50 percent of its
gross receipts from gaming operations may be designated as a
smoking area in its entirety by the operator of the business.
6. The smoking of tobacco is not prohibited in:
(a) Any room or area designated for smoking pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 or paragraph (b) of subsection 3.
(b) A licensed gaming establishment. A licensed gaming
establishment may designate separate rooms or areas within the
establishment which may or may not be used for smoking.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Child care facility” means an establishment operated and
maintained to furnish care on a temporary or permanent basis,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 50 –
during the day or overnight, to five or more children under 18 years
of age, if compensation is received for the care of any of those
children. The term does not include the home of a natural person
who provides child care.
(b) “Licensed gaming establishment” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 463.0169.
(c) “Public building” means any building or office space owned
or occupied by:
(1) Any component of the Nevada System of Higher
Education and used for any purpose related to the System.
(2) The State of Nevada and used for any public purpose,
other than that used by the Department of Corrections to house or
provide other services to offenders.
(3) Any county, city, school district or other political
subdivision of the State and used for any public purpose.
 If only part of a building is owned or occupied by an entity
described in this paragraph, the term means only that portion of the
building which is so owned or occupied.
(d) “School bus” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 483.160.
(e) “Video arcade” means a facility legally accessible to persons
under 18 years of age which is intended primarily for the use of
pinball and video machines for amusement and which contains a
minimum of 10 such machines.
Sec. 54. NRS 226.454 is hereby amended to read as follows:
226.454 “Provider of health care” means:
1. A physician;
2. A physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or
633 of NRS;
3. A dentist;
4. A licensed nurse;
5. A person who holds a license as an attendant or is certified
as an emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS;
6. An optometrist;
7. An audiologist;
8. A practitioner of respiratory care;
9. A podiatric physician;
10. A psychologist;
11. A clinical professional counselor;
12. A genetic counselor;
13. A perfusionist;
[13.] 14. A pharmacist or pharmacy technician;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 51 –
[14.] 15. An associate in social work, a social worker, a master
social worker, an independent social worker or a clinical social
worker licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS;
[15.] 16. A midwife; or
[16.] 17. A provider of doula services who is enrolled with the
Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of
Health and Human Services to receive reimbursement through
Medicaid pursuant to NRS 422.27177.
Sec. 55. NRS 288.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.140 1. It is the right of every local government
employee, subject to the limitations provided in subsections 3, 4 and
5, to join any employee organization of the employee’s choice or to
refrain from joining any employee organization. A local government
employer shall not discriminate in any way among its employees on
account of membership or nonmembership in an employee
organization.
2. The recognition of an employee organization for negotiation,
pursuant to this chapter, does not preclude any local government
employee who is not a member of that employee organization from
acting for himself or herself with respect to any condition of his or
her employment, but any action taken on a request or in adjustment
of a grievance shall be consistent with the terms of an applicable
negotiated agreement, if any.
3. A police officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff or other law
enforcement officer may be a member of an employee organization
only if such employee organization is composed exclusively of law
enforcement officers.
4. A civilian employee of a metropolitan police department
which is organized pursuant to chapter 280 of NRS may be a
member of an employee organization only if such employee
organization is composed exclusively of civilian employees of a
metropolitan police department which is organized pursuant to
chapter 280 of NRS.
5. The following persons may not be a member of an employee
organization:
(a) A supervisory employee described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of NRS 288.138, including but not limited to appointed
officials and department heads who are primarily responsible for
formulating and administering management, policy and programs.
(b) A doctor or physician who is employed by a local
government employer.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, an attorney
who is employed by a local government employer and who is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 52 –
assigned to a civil law division, department or agency. The
provisions of this paragraph do not apply with respect to an attorney
for the duration of a collective bargaining agreement to which the
attorney is a party as of July 1, 2011.
6. As used in this section, “doctor or physician” means a
doctor, physician, genetic counselor, homeopathic physician,
osteopathic physician, naprapath, chiropractic physician,
practitioner of Oriental medicine, podiatric physician or practitioner
of optometry, as those terms are defined or used, respectively, in
NRS 630.014, 630A.050, 633.091, chapter 634 of NRS, chapter
634A of NRS, NRS 634B.050, chapter 635 of NRS or chapter 636
of NRS.
Sec. 56. NRS 439A.0195 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
439A.0195 “Practitioner” means a physician licensed under
chapter 630, 630A or 633 of NRS, genetic counselor, dentist,
licensed nurse, dispensing optician, optometrist, registered physical
therapist, podiatric physician, licensed psychologist, chiropractic
physician, naprapath, doctor of Oriental medicine in any form,
medical laboratory director or technician, pharmacist or other person
whose principal occupation is the provision of services for health.
Sec. 57. NRS 598A.360 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598A.360 “Practitioner” means a physician licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, physician assistant, genetic
counselor, licensed nurse, dispensing optician, optometrist,
practitioner of respiratory care, registered physical therapist,
occupational therapist, licensed psychologist or perfusionist.
Sec. 58. NRS 685B.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
685B.120 1. Any person who provides coverage in this State
for the cost of:
(a) Medical care;
(b) Surgery;
(c) Chiropractic;
(d) Physical therapy;
(e) Speech-language pathology;
(f) Audiology;
(g) Professional care of mental health;
(h) Dental care;
(i) Hospital care;
(j) Ophthalmic care;
(k) Naprapathy;
(l) Genetic counseling; or
[(l)] (m) Ambulance services,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 53 –
 whether the coverage provides for direct payment, reimbursement
or any other method of payment, is subject to regulation by the
Division and to the provisions of this Code unless the person shows
that while providing such coverage the person is subject to
regulation by the Federal Government.
2. A nonprofit corporation that provides prepaid ambulance
services is not subject to regulation by the Division or to the
provisions of this Code if the corporation presents evidence
satisfactory to the Commissioner that the corporation is subject to
regulation by a political subdivision of this State pursuant to an
exclusive franchise which limits the number of times any such
prepaid services may be used to a defined number that are medically
necessary.
Sec. 59. NRS 686A.2825 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.2825 “Practitioner” means:
1. A physician, genetic counselor, dentist, nurse, dispensing
optician, optometrist, physical therapist, podiatric physician,
psychologist, chiropractic physician, naprapath, doctor of Oriental
medicine in any form, director or technician of a medical laboratory,
pharmacist, person who holds a license to engage in radiation
therapy and radiologic imaging or a limited license to engage in
radiologic imaging pursuant to chapter 653 of NRS or other
provider of health services who is authorized to engage in his or her
occupation by the laws of this state or another state; and
2. An attorney admitted to practice law in this state or any
other state.
Sec. 60. 1. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of
this act, any person who is engaged in the practice of genetic
counseling on or before January 1, 2026, may continue to engage in
the practice of genetic counseling without obtaining a license
pursuant to section 7 of this act until July 1, 2026.
2. As used in this section, “genetic counseling” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 60.5. As soon as practicable after the effective date of this
section, the Board of Medical Examiners shall appoint to the
Genetic Counseling Advisory Council created by section 5.9 of this
act:
1. The member described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
section 5.9 of this act and one member described in paragraph (b) of
that subsection to initial terms that expire on January 1, 2027; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 54 –
2. Two members described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of
section 5.9 of this act and the member described in paragraph (c) of
that subsection to initial terms that expire on January 1, 2028.
Sec. 61. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 62. 1. This section and sections 5.9 and 60.5 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 5.6, inclusive, 6 to 17, inclusive, 19 to 60,
inclusive, and 61 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
3. Section 18 of this act becomes effective on January 1, 2031.
4. Section 5.9 of this act expires by limitation on January 1,
2031.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)